Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 2.2
TRANSPORTATION OF NUCLEAR MATERIALS

40-2.2-101 to 40-2.2-213. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article repealed, p. 1612, § 14, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1986. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1993, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For the "Hazardous Materials Transportation Act of 1987", see parts 1, 2, and 3 of article 20 of title 42.